Iowa, session 2025-2026, SSB3083.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 5969XC (3) 91 dg/ko S.F. _____ Section 1. Section 135G.1, subsection 12, paragraph c, Code 1 2026, is amended by striking the paragraph. 2 Sec. 2. Section 135G.3, Code 2026, is amended by adding the 3 following new subsection: 4 NEW SUBSECTION . 1A. Within twenty-four hours of a 5 residentâs admission to a subacute care facility, the subacute 6 care facility shall develop a written treatment care plan with 7 the resident. 8 Sec. 3. NEW SECTION . 135G.3A Insurance authorization. 9 Upon a mental health professionalâs request for prior 10 authorization for insurance coverage of an individualâs 11 subacute mental health care service, a managed care 12 organization shall provide a determination to the mental health 13 professional for the preauthorization request as follows: 14 1. Within forty-eight hours after the date of receipt of an 15 urgent preauthorization request. 16 2. Within five calendar days after the date of receipt of a 17 nonurgent preauthorization request. 18 3. Within ten calendar days after the date of receipt of a 19 nonurgent preauthorization request involving complex or unique 20 circumstances. 21 Sec. 4. DEPARTMENTS OF HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES AND 22 INSPECTIONS, APPEALS, AND LICENSING ââ ADMINISTRATIVE RULE 23 REVIEW. The department of health and human services and the 24 department of inspections, appeals, and licensing shall do all 25 of the following: 26 1. Collaborate to review each departmentâs administrative 27 rules adopted pursuant to section 135G.10 and eliminate any 28 rule the departments determine impedes any of the following 29 more than the benefit the rule provides: 30 a. Establishment of new subacute mental health care 31 facilities and services. 32 b. Expansion of existing subacute mental health care 33 facilities and services. 34 c. Ease of access to subacute mental health care facilities 35 -1- LSB 5969XC (3) 91 dg/ko 1/ 3 S.F. _____ and services. 1 2. Modify the departmentsâ respective rules to allow a 2 subacute mental health care facility to increase the number of 3 beds available to provide subacute mental health care without 4 the facility being defined as a mental health institution. 5 3. Modify the departmentsâ respective rules so that the 6 requirements to employ an individual at a subacute mental 7 health care facility are less stringent than the requirements 8 for the same employment at a state mental health institute. 9 Sec. 5. EMERGENCY RULES. The department of health and 10 human services and the department of inspections, appeals, 11 and licensing may adopt emergency rules under section 17A.4, 12 subsection 3, and section 17A.5, subsection 2, paragraph âbâ, 13 to implement the provisions of this Act and shall submit 14 such rules to the administrative rules coordinator and 15 the administrative code editor pursuant to section 17A.5, 16 subsection 1, within the same period. The rules shall be 17 effective immediately upon filing unless a later date is 18 specified in the rules. Any rules adopted in accordance with 19 this section shall also be published as a notice of intended 20 action as provided in section 17A.4. 21 Sec. 6. EFFECTIVE DATE. This Act, being deemed of immediate 22 importance, takes effect upon enactment. 23